South Dakota, session 2026, HB1022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 23A-28B-28 be AMENDED:
23A-28B-28. The department shall receive, review, and investigate any claim for
victims' compensation that is properly filed. Following review and investigation, the
department shall issue an order that includes:
(1) Findings of fact;
(2) The amount of compensation, if any, payable under the provisions of this chapter;
(3) The name of any person to whom compensation is payable;
(4) A notice that the claimant may request commission review of the order in
accordance with § 23A-28B-32; and
(5) Any other information that the department deems necessary.
The department shall file the order with the commission and serve notice of the
order by mailing, emailing, or hand-delivering a copy to the claimant.
Section 2. That § 23A-28B-31 be REPEALED.

26.398.11 2 1022
An Act to revise and repeal provisions related to the crime victims' compensation program.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1022
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1022 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1022 ENROLLED